Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 1. State Troopers.

Collateral references. —

70 Am. Jur. 2d, Sheriffs, Police, and Constables, §§ 1 et seq.

81A C.J.S., States, §§ 158, 252.

Relationship between policeman’s performance of official duties and his death, for purpose of recovery of benefits by survivors. 27 ALR2d 1004.

Assertion of immunity as ground for removing or discharging public officer or employee.
44 ALR2d 789.

Validity, construction, and application of enactments relating to requirement of residency within or near specified governmental unit as condition of continued employment for policemen or firemen. 4 ALR4th 380.

Validity, construction, and application of regulations regarding outside employment of governmental employees or officers. 62 ALR5th 671.

Liability of municipality or other governmental unit for failure to provide police protection from crime. 90 ALR5th 273.

Sec. 18.65.010.
Commissioner of public safety may appoint special officers.

The commissioner of public safety may appoint as special officers qualified police officers of the federal, state, or local government units or other persons with adequate police training over the age of 19 years, as the commissioner considers necessary to aid and assist the division of state troopers in the enforcement of the criminal laws of the state. Each special officer appointed serves without compensation and at the pleasure of the commissioner of public safety and appointments shall be of limited duration.

Each person appointed as a special officer under this section may prevent crime, pursue and apprehend offenders, obtain legal evidence, institute criminal proceedings, execute warrants of arrest or search and seizure, or other criminal process issuing from any court of the state. A special officer may make arrests in the same manner as a member of the division of state troopers. The authority and duties conferred by this section may be exercised in each case only within the geographical limits determined by the commissioner of public safety.

Each special officer shall carry identification issued by the commissioner of public safety and shall carry firearms in the manner the commissioner of public safety requires. Each person appointed shall take the constitutional oath of office. Persons appointed may hold other public or private employment.

[Repealed, § 3 ch 6 SLA 1978.]

History.

(§§ 1 — 4 ch 106 SLA 1961; am § 2 ch 117 SLA 1968; am § 5 ch 245 SLA 1970; am § 3 ch 6 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

For workers’ compensation coverage of special officers, see AS

23.30.241

.

Opinions of attorney general. —

While the statute vests apparently broad discretionary authority in the commissioner of public safety, the legislative history of the bill which originally led to the enactment of this section indicates that this authority was to be restrictively exercised within the confines of certain criteria and that the central purpose of the bill was to strengthen state trooper personnel in the more remote areas of Alaska. December 22, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

The authority conferred by a special commission must be necessary to aid or assist the state troopers in their enforcement efforts, and without this direct connection commissions should not be granted under the authority of this section.
December 22, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

A comparison of the language of subsection (b), which describes the general powers and duties of a specially commissioned officer, with that of AS

18.65.080

, which describes the powers and duties of commissioned officers of the Department of Public Safety with particular reference to “member” of the state troopers, supports the conclusion that a specially commissioned officer is a “peace officer” for purposes of both AS

01.10.060

(6) [now AS

01.10.060

(7)] and AS 11.55.020 [now AS

11.61.200

] when performing law enforcement duties within the limitations set forth on the face of a special commission and furthermore, may carry concealed weapons without violating AS 11.55.010 [now AS

11.61.220

] while performing these duties to the extent permitted by the commission itself. December 22, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 18.65.020.
Uniforms and equipment.

The state shall provide members of the state troopers with standard uniforms, vehicles, supplies, and equipment necessary to carry out the objects and purposes of AS

18.65.020

—

18.65.110

.
All of this property shall remain the property of the state.

History.

(§ 6 ch 144 SLA 1953; am § 3 ch 117 SLA 1968)

Sec. 18.65.030.
Establishment of stations and headquarters.

The commissioner of public safety shall establish stations and headquarters at the places and localities that are necessary for the enforcement of the laws. The state troopers may, with the approval of the governor, have the right to use land and buildings for the accommodation of its members, their vehicles, and equipment.

History.

(§ 6 ch 144 SLA 1953; am § 4 ch 117 SLA 1968)

Sec. 18.65.040.
Service without uniform.

The commissioner of public safety may direct a member to serve without wearing a uniform.

History.

(§ 6 ch 144 SLA 1953)

Sec. 18.65.050.
Central information.

The Department of Public Safety shall make available central information on fingerprints, handwriting, ballistics, stains, and other evidence of crime.

History.

(§ 7 ch 144 SLA 1953)

Collateral references. —

Privilege of custodian, apart from statute or rule, from disclosure, in civil action, of official police records and reports. 36 ALR2d 1318.

Validity, construction, and application of statutory provisions relating to public access to police records. 82 ALR3d 19.

Sec. 18.65.060.
Peace officers to cooperate. [Repealed, § 4 ch 118 SLA 1994.]

Sec. 18.65.070.
Destruction of department files a misdemeanor. [Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 18.65.080.
Powers and duties of department and members of state troopers.

The Department of Public Safety and each member of the state troopers is charged with the enforcement of all criminal laws of the state, and has the power of a peace officer of the state or a municipality and those powers usually and customarily exercised by peace officers.
Each member of the state troopers may prevent crime, pursue and apprehend offenders, obtain legal evidence, institute criminal proceedings, execute any lawful warrant or order of arrest, make an arrest without warrant for a violation of law committed in the presence of the state trooper, and may cooperate with other law enforcement agencies in detecting crime, apprehending criminals, and preserving law and order in the state.

History.

(§ 8 ch 144 SLA 1953; am § 2 ch 152 SLA 1955; am § 5 ch 117 SLA 1968)

Opinions of attorney general. —

While this statute grants comprehensive enforcement responsibilities to the Department of Public Safety, the language used does not indicate that such responsibility is intended to be exclusive and therefore denied other departments within the executive branch.
March 29, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

A comparison of the language of AS

18.65.010(b)

, which describes the general powers and duties of a specially commissioned officer, with that of this section, which describes the powers and duties of commissioned officers to the Department of Public Safety with particular reference to “member” of the state troopers, supports the conclusion that a specially commissioned officer is a “peace officer” for purposes of both AS

01.10.060

(6) and AS 11.55.020 (now AS

11.61.200

) when performing law enforcement duties within the limitations set forth on the face of a special commission and furthermore, may carry concealed weapons without violating AS 11.55.010 (now AS

11.61.220

) while performing these duties to the extent permitted by the commission itself. December 22, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Department of Public Safety has clear authority to determine whether a potentially endangered tanker should remain at a facility or be required to move into open water to protect life and property. January 11, 1980 Op. Att’y Gen.

This section grants broad authority over law enforcement but makes no mention of firefighting; consequently, it does not operate to undercut the authority vested by AS

18.70.075

. May 17, 1983 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Department of Public Safety, division of fish and wildlife protection, has enforcement authority over all criminal matters of the state, civil matters arising under AS 16, and guide regulation violations. June 19, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 18.65.085.
Narcotic drugs and alcohol enforcement.

There is established in the Department of Public Safety, division of state troopers, a narcotic drugs and alcohol enforcement unit for the purpose of investigating and combating the illicit sale and distribution of narcotic drugs and alcoholic beverages in the state. Enforcement of the alcoholic beverage control laws shall focus primarily on the investigation, apprehension, and conviction of persons who violate AS

04.11.010

by selling, importing, or possessing alcoholic beverages in violation of a local option adopted by a municipality or established village under AS

04.11.491

.

The commissioner of public safety shall prepare a report concerning the activities of the narcotic drugs and alcohol enforcement unit. The commissioner shall notify the legislature on the first day of each regular session that the report is available. The report must include, but is not limited to, the number of arrests made, the kind, amount, and value of narcotic drugs and alcoholic beverages seized, the sentences received by narcotic drug and alcohol offenders, and an overall view of the narcotic drug and illicit alcohol problem in the state.

The Department of Public Safety may establish and administer a reward program, and provide grants to municipalities, established villages, and, at the request of a municipality or established village, to a nonprofit association that administers a village public safety officer program, for reward programs leading to the apprehension and conviction of persons who violate AS

04.11.010

by selling, importing, or possessing alcoholic beverages in violation of a local option adopted by a municipality or established village under AS

04.11.491

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 74 SLA 1973; am §§ 1, 2 ch 170 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 154 SLA 1990; am § 33 ch 21 SLA 1995; am §§ 61, 62 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 34 SLA 2007)

Sec. 18.65.085.
Narcotic drugs and alcohol enforcement.

There is established in the Department of Public Safety, division of state troopers, a narcotic drugs and alcohol enforcement unit for the purpose of investigating and combating the illicit sale and distribution of narcotic drugs and alcoholic beverages in the state. Enforcement of the alcoholic beverage control laws shall focus primarily on the investigation, apprehension, and conviction of persons who violate AS

04.11.010

by selling, importing, or possessing alcoholic beverages in violation of a local option adopted by a municipality or established village under AS

04.11.491

.

The commissioner of public safety shall prepare a report concerning the activities of the narcotic drugs and alcohol enforcement unit. The commissioner shall notify the legislature on the first day of each regular session that the report is available. The report must include, but is not limited to, the number of arrests made, the kind, amount, and value of narcotic drugs and alcoholic beverages seized, the sentences received by narcotic drug and alcohol offenders, and an overall view of the narcotic drug and illicit alcohol problem in the state.

The Department of Public Safety may establish and administer a reward program, and provide grants to municipalities, established villages, and, at the request of a municipality or established village, to a nonprofit association that administers a village public safety officer program, for reward programs leading to the apprehension and conviction of persons who violate AS

04.09.060

,

04.09.850

, or AS

04.11.010

by selling, importing, or possessing alcoholic beverages in violation of a local option adopted by a municipality or established village under AS

04.11.491

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 74 SLA 1973; am §§ 1, 2 ch 170 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 154 SLA 1990; am § 33 ch 21 SLA 1995; am §§ 61, 62 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 34 SLA 2007; am § 158 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 18.65.086.
Investigative unit on sexually abused and criminally exploited children.

There is established in the Department of Public Safety, division of state troopers, a special unit for the purpose of investigating cases of repeated child sexual abuse and the criminal exploitation of children.

The commissioner of public safety shall prepare, in odd-numbered years, a report concerning the activities of the special unit on repeated child sexual abuse and the criminal exploitation of children. The commissioner shall notify the legislature by the first day of each regular session in an odd-numbered year that the report is available. The report must include, but is not limited to, the number of arrests made in cases of repeated child sexual abuse and the criminal exploitation of children, the number of investigations that result in the Department of Health and Social Services taking temporary or permanent custody of the child, the sentences received by persons convicted in the state of child sexual abuse or criminal exploitation of a child, and an overall view of the problems of child sexual abuse and the criminal exploitation of children in the state.

In this section,

“child” means a person under 18 years of age at the time the alleged offense was committed by or against the person;

“criminal exploitation of children” means the use of a child by an adult in a criminal manner for the personal gratification or profit of the adult;

“repeated child sexual abuse” means conduct that is a criminal sexual offense against a child under AS 11 and that is committed against the child more than once or against more than one child.

History.

(§ 1 ch 114 SLA 1986; am § 34 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 2 ch 34 SLA 2007)

Sec. 18.65.087.
Central registry of sex offenders.

The Department of Public Safety shall maintain a central registry of sex offenders and child kidnappers and shall adopt regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this section and AS 12.63. A post of the Alaska state troopers or a municipal police department that receives registration or change of address information under AS

12.63.010

shall forward the information within five working days after receipt to the central registry of sex offenders and child kidnappers. Unless the sex offender or child kidnapper provides proof satisfactory to the department that the sex offender or child kidnapper is not physically present in the state or that the time limits described in AS

12.63.010

have passed, the Department of Public Safety may enter and maintain in the registry information described in AS 12.63.010 about a sex offender or child kidnapper that the department obtains from

the sex offender or child kidnapper under AS 12.63;

a post of the Alaska state troopers or a municipal police department under this subsection;

a court judgment under AS

12.55.148

, AS

26.05.890(g)

,

26.05.893(d)

,

26.05.900(d)

, or

26.05.935(d)

;

the Department of Corrections under AS

33.30.012

or

33.30.035

;

the Federal Bureau of Investigation or another sex offender registration agency outside this state if the information indicates that a sex offender or child kidnapper is believed to be residing or planning to reside in the state or cannot be located;

a criminal justice agency in the state or another jurisdiction;

the department’s central repository under AS 12.62; information entered in the registry from the repository is not subject to the requirements of AS

12.62.160(c)(3)

or (4);

the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs; or

another reliable source as defined in regulations adopted by the department.

Information about a sex offender or child kidnapper that is contained in the central registry, including sets of fingerprints, is confidential and not subject to public disclosure except as to the sex offender’s or child kidnapper’s name, aliases, address, photograph, physical description, description of motor vehicles, license numbers of motor vehicles, and vehicle identification numbers of motor vehicles, place of employment, date of birth, crime for which convicted, date of conviction, place and court of conviction, length and conditions of sentence, and a statement as to whether the offender or kidnapper is in compliance with requirements of AS 12.63 or cannot be located.

Notwithstanding (b) of this section, if a sex offender has been convicted in this state or another jurisdiction of a sex offense identified as “incest,” that offense may be disclosed under (b) of this section only as a “felony sexual abuse of a minor” conviction.

The Department of Public Safety

shall adopt regulations to

allow a sex offender or child kidnapper to review sex offender or child kidnapper registration information that refers to that sex offender or child kidnapper, and if the sex offender or child kidnapper believes the information is inaccurate or incomplete, to request the department to correct the information; if the department finds the information is inaccurate or incomplete, the department shall correct or supplement the information;

ensure the appropriate circulation to law enforcement agencies of information contained in the central registry;

ensure the anonymity of members of the public who request information under this section;

shall provide to the Department of Corrections and municipal police departments the forms and directions necessary to allow sex offenders and child kidnappers to comply with AS

12.63.010

;

may adopt regulations to establish fees to be charged for registration under AS

12.63.010

and for information requests; the fee for registration shall be based upon the actual costs of performing the registration and maintaining the central registry but may not be set at a level whereby registration is discouraged; the fee for an information request may not be greater than $10;

shall remove from the central registry of sex offenders and child kidnappers under this section information about a sex offender or child kidnapper required to register under AS

12.63.020(a)(1)(B)

at the end of the sex offender’s or child kidnapper’s duty to register if the offender or kidnapper has not been convicted of another sex offense or child kidnapping and the offender or kidnapper has supplied proof of unconditional discharge acceptable to the department; in this paragraph, “sex offense” and “child kidnapping” have the meanings given in AS

12.63.100

.

The name, address, and other identifying information of a member of the public who makes an information request under this section is not a public record under AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.295

.

When a sex offender or child kidnapper registers under AS 12.63, the Department of Public Safety shall make reasonable attempts to verify that the sex offender or child kidnapper is residing at the registered address. Reasonable attempts at verifying an address include sending certified mail, return receipt requested, to the offender or kidnapper at the registered address. The department shall make reasonable efforts to locate an offender or kidnapper who cannot be located at the registered address.

The department, at least quarterly, shall compile a list of those persons with a duty to register under AS

12.63.010

who have failed to register, whose addresses cannot be verified under (f) of this section, or who otherwise cannot be located. The department shall post this list on the Internet and request the public’s assistance in locating these persons.

The Department of Public Safety shall provide on the Internet website that the department maintains for the central registry of sex offenders and child kidnappers information as to how members of the public using the website may access or compile the information relating to sex offenders or child kidnappers for a particular geographic area on a map. The information may direct members to mapping programs available on the Internet and to Internet websites where information contained in the registry has already been converted to a map or geographic format.

Notwithstanding (b) of this section, the department may provide a method for, or may participate in a federal program that allows, the public to submit an electronic or messaging address or Internet identifier and receive a confirmation of whether the address or identifier has been registered by a registered sex offender or child kidnapper.

History.

(§ 5 ch 41 SLA 1994; am §§ 17 — 20 ch 106 SLA 1998; am § 12 ch 14 SLA 2006; am § 5 ch 42 SLA 2008; am § 14 ch 58 SLA 2010; am § 6 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2000, “AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.220

” was substituted for “AS

09.25.100

—

09.25.220

” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of
AS

09.25.100

—

09.25.220

.

Subsection (h) of this section was enacted as sec. 12, ch. 14, SLA 2006, and codified in 2006.

In 2019, “AS

12.63.020(a)(1)(B)

” was substituted for “AS

12.63.020(a)(2)

” in (d)(4) to reflect the 2019 amendment to AS

12.63.020(a)

in sec. 83, ch. 4, FSSLA 2019.

In 2020, “ AS

26.05.890(g)

” was substituted for “ AS

26.05.890(h)

” in (3)(a) to reflect the relettering of that section.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings in connection with the enactment of this section, see § 1, ch. 41, SLA 1994 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2018 amendment to subsection (a), see sec. 42(b), ch. 85, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For sex offender and child kidnapper registration, see 13 AAC 9.

For dissemination of criminal justice information, see 13 AAC 68, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a)(3), added “, AS

26.05.890(h)

,

26.05.893(d)

,

26.05.900(c)

, or

26.05.935(d)

” at the end, added (a)(8), made related and stylistic changes.

Editor's notes. —

Section 6(a), ch. 42, SLA 2008 provides that (i) of this section “[applies] to persons convicted of sex offenses or child kidnapping before, on, or after January 1, 2009, whose duty to register as a sex offender or child kidnapper has not expired under AS

12.63.010(d)(1)

on January 1, 2009.”

Sec. 18.65.090.
Department to assist other agencies.

The Department of Public Safety shall assist other departments of the state, municipal, and federal governments in the enforcement of criminal laws and regulations pertaining to those departments.

History.

(§ 9 ch 144 SLA 1953; am § 1 ch 8 SLA 1955)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska public offices commission complaints and investigations, see 2 AAC 50, art. 3.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Department of Public Safety, division of fish and wildlife protection, has enforcement authority over all criminal matters of the state, civil matters arising under AS 16, and guide regulation violations. June 19, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Department of Public Safety has the authority to enter into a cooperative agreement with the United States Department of the Interior, Fish and Wildlife Service, for cross-delegation of enforcement authority. May 12, 1989 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 18.65.100.
Power to command assistance from others.

The Department of Public Safety and members of the state troopers may command the assistance of any able-bodied person to aid in accomplishing the purposes of AS

18.65.020

—

18.65.110

, and when called, the person, during the time assistance is required, is considered a member of the state troopers and subject to AS

18.65.020

—

18.65.110

.

History.

(§ 10 ch 144 SLA 1953; am § 6 ch 117 SLA 1968)

Sec. 18.65.110.
Members not to interfere with rights and property.

Members of the state troopers may not interfere with the rights or property of any person except in a lawful manner necessary for the prevention of crime or the capture and arrest of an offender.

History.

(§ 11 ch 144 SLA 1953; am § 7 ch 117 SLA 1968)